Massachusetts, session 194th, H4669.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
executive office of health and human services shall study the continuum of care for persons with
behavioral health conditions, including, but not limited to, mental health, substance use or co-
occurring mental health and substance use disorder, and the feasibility of and potential need for
creating regional facilities for this purpose.
(b) The study shall examine and include recommendations on: (i) the current regional
availability of and strategies for overcoming barriers to care and care gaps in behavioral health
services, including, but not limited to mental health, substance use and co-occurring mental
health and substance use disorder services, acute treatment services, clinical stabilization
services, transitional support services, residential recovery home services and outpatient
treatment, including, but not limited to, medication assisted treatment; (ii) the impact on
communities in which current services and programs are located; (iii) institutional barriers that
individuals face in accessing or progressing through the treatment continuum, including
of 3

behavioral and physical health needs and acuity, funding, treatment costs and rates, program
space and capacity, access to transportation and transit options, harm reduction programs and
services, accessibility, housing availability and any other barriers caused by unconnected
services or a lack of continuum of care within the current recovery process; and (iv) the creation
of an enhanced service architecture that addresses such gaps and barriers, including the need for
regional continuum of care facilities for the treatment of mental health and substance use
disorders, including co-occurring mental health and substance use disorders, and the optimal
capacity at each level of care to ensure individuals can efficiently access and move through each
level of care as clinically necessary.
(c) The study shall be conducted with input from relevant stakeholders, including, but not
limited to: (i) professional associations and organizations and health care providers with
expertise in the provision of care to people with substance use disorder and co-occurring
substance use and mental health conditions; (ii) professional associations and organizations and
individuals with expertise in the treatment of substance use disorder, co-occurring substance use
and mental health conditions and equity in access to health care; (iii) behavioral health
professionals with expertise in providing culturally-competent care to people with substance use
disorder and co-occurring substance use and mental health conditions; (iv) individuals who have
lived experience of seeking or receiving substance use disorder and co-occurring substance use
and mental health services or treatment; (v) executive agencies of the commonwealth or its
political subdivisions; and (vi) other relevant stakeholders identified by the secretary; provided,
however, that the executive office may consult with external experts or other third-party entities
when the office lacks the specific scientific, medical or technical expertise necessary for the
performance of its responsibilities under this section; and provided further, that the executive
of 3

office shall disclose when such external expert or third-party entity contributes to its analysis and
reporting and the identity of such external expert or third-party entity.
(d) Not later than 1 year from the effective date of this act, the executive office shall
submit a detailed report with its findings and recommendations, along with drafts of any
legislation necessary to carry out such recommendations and any additional information deemed
relevant by the executive office, to the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate, the
joint committee on mental health, substance use and recovery, the joint committee on health care
financing and the governor.
(e) Not later than 1 year following submission of the first report and by December 31
annually thereafter, the executive office shall submit a report detailing the commonwealth’s
progress in implementing the recommendations contained in the preceding report, including any
barriers to the implementation of such recommendations and any additional recommendations to
address such barriers, to the clerks of the house of representative and the senate, the joint
committee on mental health, substance use and recovery, the joint committee on health care
financing and the governor.
of 3